California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

5430.

If the notice to abate is recorded before the commissioner incurs the expense of abatement, the amount which is incurred or expended by the county in the abatement is a lien on the land against which the expense is chargeable. In a case pursuant to Section 5494, the total expense shall be prorated and chargeable against each parcel of land in proportion to the acreage of such parcel which is served by water from the canal or ditch that is involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5431.

A notice which sets forth the amount expended shall be recorded within 30 days after the date of payment of the last item of expense of the abatement by the county. The amount is a lien from the date of the recording of the notice of abatement pursuant to Section 5427.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5432.

If a copy of the notice to abate a public nuisance, as described in Section 5401, is recorded and a copy is served upon or mailed to the holder of any encumbrance of record pursuant to this article, the lien is superior to all encumbrances, existing and future, except liens for taxes and assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1491, Sec. 13.2.)
-------------------------------------------

5433.

If the sum which is secured by lien is not repaid to the county within 80 days from the recording of the amount of the lien, there shall be added to the sum a penalty of 15 percent. The penalty shall also be secured by the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5434.

Except as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 5461) of this chapter, the district attorney of the county which makes payment of the abatement expense shall, within 120 days after the notice which is required by Section 5431 is recorded, commence in the name and for the benefit of such county, an action to foreclose the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5435.

(a) If, after foreclosure, the property is sold, enough of the proceeds shall be paid into the treasury of the county which forecloses the lien as shall satisfy the lien, penalty, and costs.

(b) If there is any surplus, it shall be paid to the owner of the property, if he is known. If the owner of the property is not known, the surplus shall be paid into the court for his use at such time as he is ascertained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5436.

If no action to foreclose is commenced within 120 days subsequent to the recordation of the notice which is required by Section 5431, the lien ceases to exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notice and Expense of Abatement on Tax-Deeded Property [5461. - 5464.]

5461.

If any pest is found to exist upon any property which has been deeded to the state for nonpayment of taxes, the notice of abatement shall be served by recording and mailing a copy of the notice to the State Controller, and either by personally serving or by mailing a copy of it, in the manner provided in Sections 5425 to 5428, inclusive, to the last owner of record prior to the deeding of the property to the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5462.

If the expense of abatement becomes a lien on such property, as provided in Sections 5429 to 5432, inclusive, and the property is redeemed or sold to a private person at a tax sale, the action to foreclose the lien shall be commenced within 120 days after the redemption or sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5463.

If no action to foreclose is commenced within 120 days subsequent to the redemption or sale of the property, the lien ceases to exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5464.

If the property is acquired by the state, or by any municipal corporation or political subdivision, and the right of redemption is terminated, the lien terminates at the time the right of redemption is terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice and Expense of Abatement on Other Public Property [5491. - 5494.]

5491.

If any pest is found to exist in any public park or along any street, highway, or other property which is subject to the control of a city or county, the notice of abatement shall be served on the chairman of the governing body of the city or county. If the eradication, control, or destruction of the pest is performed by the commissioner, the cost of the eradication, control, or destruction is a city or county charge, as the case may be, and shall be paid from the general fund of the city or county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5492.

If any pest is found to exist in any park or along any street, highway, right-of-way, or other property which is subject to the control of any agency of the state, the director, upon receiving a report of the existence of the pest from the commissioner, shall notify the agency. He may instruct the commissioner to serve the notice upon the director or other executive officer of the agency. If the eradication, control, or destruction of the pest is performed by the commissioner, the cost of the eradication, control, or destruction is a charge against, and shall be paid from, the maintenance fund or from other funds for the support of the agency.

This section applies to a state highway right-of-way if any pest of the same kind has been, or is being, subjected to control, destruction, or eradication on other private or public property in the immediate vicinity of the right-of-way, either at the direction of the commissioner or voluntarily by the owner of such adjacent property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5493.

If any pest is found to exist upon any property which is subject to the control of any irrigation, drainage, flood control, reclamation, or levee district, or other political subdivision of the state, the notice of abatement shall be served upon the chairman of the governing body of the district or political subdivision. If the chairman is absent from the county, or for any reason cannot be served, the notice shall be served upon some other member of the governing body. If the eradication, control, or destruction of the pests upon the property is performed by the commissioner, the cost of the eradication, control, or destruction is a legal charge and shall be paid from the general maintenance or operating fund, as the case may be, of the district or political subdivision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5494.

If any pest is found to exist in or on any irrigation canal or ditch, including its lateral banks, which is not subject to the control of any district or political subdivision of the state, the notice of abatement shall be served upon all users of water from the irrigation canal or ditch that is described in the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Roadside Vegetation Control [5501. - 5509.]

5501.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Property Owners’ Roadside Vegetation Control Information Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Agency” means an agency of state government that has responsibility for roadside vegetation control operations on, or along, roadways. 

(b) “Pesticide” is defined in Section 12753.

(c) “Property owner” means an owner, lessee, or tenant of real property that is adjacent or contiguous to a roadway over which an agency has responsibility for roadside vegetation control.

(d) “Roadside” means the land adjacent to, or dividing the lanes of traffic of, a roadway. 

(e) “Roadway” means any highway, superhighway, expressway, street, road, lane, or other public thoroughfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The unannounced and poorly coordinated use of pesticides to control roadside vegetation has too frequently resulted in damage to adjacent or contiguous private property. In some instances, this activity has caused growers to needlessly suffer economic loss or damage to their crops.

(b) Property owners have a right to know beforehand the manner in which state government intends to control the roadside vegetation adjacent or contiguous to their property. 

(c) It is in the public interest to establish a voluntary mechanism by which private property owners may meet and confer with representatives of state government to enter into mutually acceptable voluntary agreements to promote coordinated programs for roadside vegetation control, and thereby minimize damage to adjacent and contiguous property.

(d) Mutually acceptable agreements may include, but are not limited to, provisions whereby the property owner assumes responsibility for roadside vegetation control in a manner which is at least as effective as that proposed by state government, the use of mechanical means of vegetation control, the use of a combination of pesticide and mechanical means of control, a delay in the application of a pesticide, or the use of different pesticides.

(e) Private property owners and representatives of state government are encouraged to voluntarily develop creative and innovative means to accomplish the goals and objectives of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5504.

An agency shall promptly provide any or all of the following information to a property owner who so requests:

(a) The date on which the agency is scheduled, or planning, to conduct roadside vegetation control and the method or methods the agency is planning to use in the roadside vegetation control operation on, or along, the part of the roadway that is adjacent or contiguous to his or her property. 

(b) The frequency with which the agency is scheduled, or is planning, to conduct a roadside vegetation control operation on, or along, the part of the roadway adjacent or contiguous to his or her property. 

(c) Any other relevant information in the possession of the agency that may be of interest to the property owner of the property adjacent or contiguous to the roadside where the vegetation control operation is to be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5505.

The agency shall not conduct a roadside vegetation control operation on that portion of the roadway for which a property owner has made a request for information pursuant to Section 5504, until both of the conditions set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been met or unless subdivision (c) applies:

(a) The agency provides the property owner the requested information pursuant to Section 5504. 

(b) The property owner did not request a meeting with the representatives of the agency within 30 days after he or she received the information or, if so requested, the meeting is held in accordance with Section 5506. 

(c) The agency provided the property owner the requested information pursuant to Section 5504, the property owner requested a meeting to be held in accordance with Section 5506, and the agency, having made a good faith effort to accommodate the property owner in scheduling and conducting a meeting, is unable to reach an agreement with the property owner on a reasonable meeting time and place within 30 days of the initial request for a meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.

(a) Within 30 days of receipt of the information required to be provided pursuant to Section 5504, the property owner may request a meeting with representatives of the agency to discuss the agency’s proposed schedule for, or method of, roadside vegetation control, or both the schedule and method to be used on, or along, the roadway adjacent or contiguous to his or her property. 

(b) Upon receipt of a request for a meeting pursuant to this section, the agency shall meet with the property owner at a mutually agreeable time and location. 

(c) The purpose of the meeting shall be to develop and adopt the following:

(1) A schedule for the roadside vegetation control operation .

(2) A method of roadside vegetation control that eliminates, or minimizes, damage to the property owner’s property while preserving the ability of the agency to conduct an effective roadside vegetation control program.

(d) The agency shall consider and, if the facts presented to the agency warrant further action in order to carry out the objectives of this chapter, do any or all of the following:

(1) Revise the schedule for the roadside vegetation control operation. 

(2) Revise the proposed methods of roadside vegetation control, including, but not limited to, the use of a pesticide or mechanical methods of control, or a combination thereof.

(3) Use different pesticides, or different combinations or concentrations of pesticides.

(4) Enter into an agreement with the property owner whereby the property owner agrees to assume the responsibility, in whole or in part, of roadside vegetation control by any lawful method of control, if the agency determines that the property owner’s method is as effective as the method proposed to be used by the agency. 

(e) The objective of this section is to establish a procedure for property owners and representatives of agencies to meet and confer in order to develop and adopt mutually acceptable times for, and methods of, well-coordinated and effective roadside vegetation control operations, and thereby minimize damage to adjacent or contiguous property.

(f) If agreement cannot be reached between the property owner and the agency, the agency shall maintain responsibility for decisions affecting roadside vegetation control in the disputed area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5507.

If the property owner does not carry out the terms of any agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 5506, as determined by the agency, the agency may immediately conduct the roadside vegetation control in accordance with the agency’s schedule and method of roadside vegetation control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5508.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5509.

Any property owner affected by the decision of the agency made pursuant to this chapter may bring an action for writ of mandamus challenging the decision pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A property owner may also request a court to issue an injunction or order any other action to restrain any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 737, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Abatement of Neglected or Abandoned Crops [5551. - 5648.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5551. - 5555.]

5551.

Any neglected or abandoned plant or crop is a public nuisance in any of the following circumstances:

(a) It is a menace to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity because of the existence of any pest, in or on it.

(b) It is a menace to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity because of the existence of any other condition than the condition described in subdivision (a).

(c) It is a host plant of, or provides a favorable or likely harbor for, any pest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5552.

Any cotton plant which is uncultivated or that is left from a previous season is presumed to harbor pests and as such is a public nuisance. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence. If any such cotton plant is not destroyed in the manner established by regulation of the director, by March 1st of any year or by such earlier date as shall be proclaimed by the director as the beginning of a host-free period pursuant to Section 5781 of this code, it is subject anytime thereafter to all remedies which are or may be given for the prevention or abatement of nuisances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

5553.

It is unlawful for any person to maintain any neglected or abandoned plant or crop which is a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5554.

All remedies for the prevention or abatement of nuisances apply to any such nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5555.

If, after service of the notice pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 5561) the nuisance is not abated within the time prescribed in the notice or such time as may be mutually agreed upon by the commissioner and the record owner or person having charge or possession of the property, the commissioner shall proceed under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 5571).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 164, Sec. 1.   Effective April 26, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Notice [5561. - 5564.]

5561.

The commissioner shall, in writing, notify the record owner or person in charge of any property having an abandoned or neglected plant or crop which the commissioner has found to be a public nuisance, of the need to remove or destroy the neglected or abandoned plant or crop. The notice required by this section shall be made by personal service or by certified mail to the address shown on the last equalized assessment roll of the county, and by posting copies of it in three conspicuous places on the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5562.

The notice required by this article shall set forth all of the following:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) The name of the owner or person who is in charge or in possession of the property.

(c) The fact that the commissioner’s findings have determined that the removal or destruction of the neglected or abandoned plant or crop provides the best means of eliminating the menace to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity.

(d) That all costs incurred by the county in the detection of the nuisance and proceedings in the abatement of the nuisance shall be charged to the owner or established as a lien on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 164, Sec. 2.   Effective April 26, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5563.

The commissioner shall, in addition to the notice required by this article, advise the owner that, unless the abandoned or neglected plant or crop is removed or destroyed within 60 days, or less than 60 days if required by county ordinance, after the date the notice was served or mailed, or by such date as may be mutually agreed upon by the commissioner and the owner, the commissioner will report the existence of the nuisance to the district attorney or to the county counsel of the county with a request that an action be filed in the superior court praying for an order to remove or destroy the neglected or abandoned crop as provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5571).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5564.

This article shall not prevent the commissioner from proceeding under any other provision of law for the purpose of abating a nuisance that constitutes an immediate hazard to adjoining or nearby property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 164, Sec. 2.   Effective April 26, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Institution of Proceedings [5571. - 5581.]

5571.

If the commissioner of any county determines by inspection that there is a condition which constitutes a nuisance, as defined in Section 5551 or 5552, on any property or premises within his jurisdiction, he shall make a report of his inspection to the district attorney or to the county counsel if the board of supervisors has authorized the county counsel pursuant to Section 26528.5 of the Government Code to file the petition prepared pursuant to this article. The commissioner in the report shall do all of the following:

(a) State that the property owner has been notified.

(b) Describe the property upon which the nuisance exists.

(c) Name the pest or other condition which in his opinion is dangerous to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity.

(d) State, if his findings justify such a statement, that the removal or destruction of the neglected or abandoned plant or crop will provide the best means for the elimination of the menace to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 164, Sec. 3.   Effective April 26, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5572.

Whenever the district attorney receives a report from the commissioner, he shall, on the basis of the report, prepare a petition to the superior court of the county praying for an order to remove or destroy the neglected or abandoned plant or crop.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5573.

The petition shall set forth all of the following:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) The name of the owner or person that is in charge or possession of the property.

(c) The name of the pest, or other condition which is a menace to the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5574.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue a citation which requires that the owner or person that is in charge or in possession of the property appear at a time and place which is specified to show cause why the neglected or abandoned plant or crop should not be removed or destroyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5575.

A copy of the citation, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served upon the record owner or upon the person that is in charge or in possession of the property, or upon an agent of either, not less than 10 days before the date which is specified in the citation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5576.

A copy of the citation, together with a copy of the petition, may also be served upon any person that appears of record to be the owner of any encumbrance upon, or interest in, the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5577.

If the property upon which the neglected or abandoned plant or crop exists has been deeded to the state for nonpayment of taxes, a copy of the citation, together with a copy of the petition, shall be mailed to the State Controller, and a copy of each shall be served upon the last owner of record prior to the deeding of the property to the state. A notice of the pendency of the action shall be recorded pursuant to Section 409 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5578.

The service of the petition and citation may be personal, by delivery to the party on whom service is required to be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5579.

If the party upon whom service is required to be made resides within the county, service may be made by leaving a copy of the citation, together with a copy of the petition, at the residence of the party between the hours of eight in the morning and six in the evening, with some person who is not less than 18 years of age. If at the time of attempted service between such hours, no such person can be found at the residence of the party, service may be made by mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5580.

If the party upon whom service is required to be made does not reside within the county, service of the petition and citation may be made by mail, if he resides or has his office at a place where there is a delivery service by mail. If there is no delivery service by mail, or if his residence is not known, service may be made by posting a copy of the citation, together with a copy of the petition, in a conspicuous place on the property on which the neglected or abandoned plant or crop is situated, at least 20 days before the date specified in the citation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5581.

Service of the petition and citation by mail shall be made pursuant to the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing and Order [5601. - 5605.]

5601.

On the day on which the citation is made returnable, the court shall hear the cause and decide whether or not the neglected or abandoned plant or crop shall be destroyed or removed. The hearing shall have precedence over all matters other than injunctions, older matters of the same character, and matters which are otherwise given precedence by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.

If the court is satisfied that the conditions which are set forth in the petition exist on the property and that the removal or destruction of the neglected or abandoned plant or crop is necessary and essential for the welfare of the agriculture of the county, district, or vicinity, it shall order the removal or destruction, within a certain time, of the neglected or abandoned plant or crop which is located upon the property described in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5603.

The order to remove or destroy the neglected or abandoned plant or crop shall be served by the commissioner, or by any person who is deputized by him for that purpose, as follows:

(a) If the owner of the property can, after due diligence, be found within the county, upon the owner.

(b) If the owner cannot, after due diligence, be found within the county, upon the person that is in charge or possession of the property.

(c) If neither the owner or person that is in charge or possession of the property can, after due diligence, be found within the county, by posting in a conspicuous place upon the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

If the order is not complied with within the time which is specified in the order, the commissioner shall cause the removal or destruction of the neglected or abandoned plant or crop which is mentioned in the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5605.

Any person that fails to comply with any lawful order of the court which is made and served pursuant to the provisions of this article and Article 2 (commencing with Section 5571) of this chapter is in contempt of court and shall be punished accordingly. The punishment is in addition to any other penalty which is provided for in this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Expense of Abatement [5631. - 5645.]

5631.

If the removal or destruction of any neglected or abandoned plant or crop which is a public nuisance as defined in Section 5551 or 5552, is undertaken by the commissioner, he shall cause a notice of lien which describes the land on which it exists to be recorded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5632.

From the date of the recording, the land which is described in the notice is subject to a lien for any expense which is incurred by the county subsequent to the recording of the notice in the abatement of the nuisance which is referred to in the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5633.

The commissioner shall keep an account of the cost of the removal or destruction and shall render an itemized report of the cost to the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5634.

The expense of the removal or destruction is a county charge which is payable out of county funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5636.

A notice which sets forth the amount which has been expended for the removal or destruction of any neglected or abandoned plant or crop which is a public nuisance, as defined in Section 5551 or 5552, shall be recorded within 30 days after the date of payment of the last item of expense incurred by the county, and such amount is a lien from the date of recording of the notice of lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5637.

The lien is superior to all encumbrances, existing and future, except liens for taxes and assessments, if a copy of the notice of lien is recorded and a copy is served upon or mailed to the holder of any encumbrance of record, at the last known address of the encumbrancer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5638.

If the address of the encumbrancer is unknown to the commissioner, he shall state in the copy of the notice that the address is unknown to him and shall mail the copy addressed to the encumbracer at the county seat of the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5639.

If the sum which is secured by the lien is not repaid to the county within 80 days from the recording of the amount of the lien, there shall be added to it a penalty of 15 percent. The penalties shall also be secured by the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5640.

Except as provided in Section 5643, the district attorney of the county which makes the payment for the expense of eradication or destruction shall, within 120 days after the lien is recorded, commence in the name and for the benefit of such county an action to foreclose the lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.

(a) If, after foreclosure the property is sold, enough of the proceeds shall be paid into the treasury of the county which forecloses the lien as shall satisfy the lien, penalty and costs.

(b) If there is any surplus, it shall be paid to the owner of the property, if he is known. If the owner of the property is not known, the surplus shall be paid into the court for his use at such time as he is ascertained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5642.

If no action to foreclose is commenced within 120 days subsequent to the recordation of the notice of lien, the lien ceases to exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5643.

If the expense of removal or destruction of any abandoned plant or crop becomes a lien on property which has been deeded to the state for nonpayment of taxes, as provided in Sections 5635 to 5637, inclusive, and the property is redeemed or sold to a private person at a tax sale, the action to foreclose the lien shall be commenced within 120 days after the redemption or sale of the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5644.

If no action to foreclose is commenced within 120 days subsequent to the redemption or sale of the property, the lien ceases to exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5645.

If the property is acquired by the state, or by any municipal corporation or political subdivision, and the right of redemption is terminated, the lien terminates at the time the right of redemption is terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Civil Penalties [5646. - 5648.]

5646.

For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Good faith action” means a diligent and honest effort to abate the nuisance identified in a notice provided by the agricultural commissioner, as determined by a reasonable person.

(b) (1) “Pest” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5006.

(2) “Pest” does not include a beneficial organism that is used as a biological control agent or a conservation practice standard or an on-farm management practice, including a standard or practice identified by the Natural
 Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture’s Field Office Technical Guide or through the Healthy Soils Program, established pursuant to Section 569.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 5648.)
-------------------------------------------

5647.

(a) In lieu of imposing a lien pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5631), a commissioner may levy a civil penalty against a person who violates Section 5553 if the violation constitutes a pest-related nuisance to an adjoining or nearby property and the violation results in economic or ecological damage or would result in economic or ecological damage if the pest-related nuisance is not abated. The civil penalty shall be in an amount of up to five hundred dollars ($500), based on the severity of the nuisance and the person’s ability to pay, for each acre of property found to be in violation of Section 5553, as described in this subdivision.

(b) (1) A minimum of 30 days before a civil penalty is levied pursuant to subdivision (a), the person charged with a violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard. This shall include the right to review the evidence and the right to present evidence on their own behalf.

(2) The notice shall include the internet website of the University of California Statewide Integrated Pest Management Program.

(3) Upon service of the notice, the commissioner shall refer the person charged with the violation to the nearest University of California Cooperative Extension service office.

(4) If the person charged with the violation cannot, after a reasonable search, be found
 within the county, the notice shall be served by posting copies of it in three conspicuous places upon the property or premises or by mailing a copy of the notice to the
 owner of the property or premises at their last known address.

(5) (A) The notice shall include, either within the notice or in a separate document that accompanies the notice, a statement that reads: “This is a notice of a violation of Section 5553 of the California Food and Agricultural Code, relating to maintaining a public nuisance. This notice of a violation has been issued by your county’s agricultural commissioner. A party may appeal this notice of a violation pursuant to Section 5311 of the California Food and Agricultural Code. For more information or assistance, please contact their office. Do not ignore this notice.”

(B) The statement described in
 subparagraph (A) shall be in both English and in any other language that over 10 percent of the persons residing within the county solely speak.

(c) If the person charged with the violation takes a good faith action to rectify the violation within 30 days of receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (b), the person shall not be liable for a civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) If the person charged with the violation does not take a good faith action to rectify the violation within 45 days from the issuance of a civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (a), the commissioner may increase the previously issued civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), based on the severity of the nuisance and the person’s ability to pay, for each acre of property found to be in
 violation of Section 5553, as described in subdivision (a).

(e) For purposes of this article, none of the following constitute sole evidence of a violation of Section 5553:

(1) The use or presence of a biological control or beneficial organism.

(2) (A) The use of a conservation practice standard, identified by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture’s Field Office Technical Guide, or an on-farm management practice, identified through the Healthy Soils Program, established pursuant to Section 569.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not limit a commissioner’s authority to abate a pest that is
 harbored by a neglected or abandoned plant or crop. 

(f) Subdivision (d) of Section 5311 shall apply to any civil penalty levied pursuant to this article.

(g) Any moneys recovered by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the county general fund in the county in which the action is brought and shall be allocated to the commissioner to cover costs related to the enforcement of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 5648.)
-------------------------------------------

5648.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 5, commencing with Section 5646.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Special Quarantine, Control, and Abatement Methods [5701. - 5852.]



  ARTICLE 1. Hold Notices on Infested and Nearby Properties [5701. - 5705.]

5701.

(a) If any pest exists on any premises, the director or the commissioner may hold any plant or other host or possible carrier which is, or may be, capable of disseminating or carrying the pest. The director or the commissioner also may hold the plants, other hosts, or other possible carriers on any premises within five miles of the premises on which the pest was found to exist. The director or commissioner shall notify the owner of the plant or other host or possible carrier, or his or her agent, of this action, and the issuance of any shipping permit or nursery stock certificate with respect to the plant or other host or possible carrier shall be refused and any such permit or certificate which has been previously issued shall be revoked.
